Utah statutes.
63M-1-1302.   Purpose.

This part is enacted to create the Governor's Economic Development Coordinating Council for the purpose of:

(1)  planning, coordinating, and recommending economic development strategies, goals, and activities for industries, businesses, and other public and private sector entities and economic development stakeholders; and

(2)  coordinating activities that enhance investment in Utah businesses from the private sector to maximize the availability of venture and seed capital for research and business growth and development in the state.

